Utah statutes.
54-8-14.   Declaration of costs -- Contents of resolution.

After the preparation of the proposed assessment list, the governing body shall cause to be prepared for adoption at the hearing hereinafter provided for, a resolution declaring the entire cost of the improvement including the cost of construction as determined from the costs and feasibility report and other incidental costs, legal and fiscal fees and costs, the cost of the publication of notices and all other costs properly incident to the construction of the improvement and the financing thereof. Such resolution shall specify what share, if any, of the total cost is payable from sources other than the imposition of assessments and shall incorporate the proposed assessment list provided for in Section 54-8-13.



Enacted by Chapter 157, 1969 General Session

